Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-801
District; how created.

Independently of, and in addition to any and all other means or methods provided by the laws of this state for the creation of public power districts, such districts may also be created in the method and manner in sections 70-801 to 70-808 provided.

Laws 1949, c. 196, § 1, p. 571.